Generated/uz.aff
FLAG long
# SON/SON-TARTIB : TRT:1SHB:TSH:MI?
SFX BU Y 640
SFX BU 0 nchimnimi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimnichi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimnidir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimnida [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimniku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimnimikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimnimidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimnidirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimningmi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimningchi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimningdir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimningda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimningku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimningmikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimningmidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimningdirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdami [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdachi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdadir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdada [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdaku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdamikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdamidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdadirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdanmi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdanchi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdandir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdanda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdanku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdanmikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdanmidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdandirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdagimi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdagichi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdagidir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdagida [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdagiku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdagimikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdagimidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdagidirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdagidekmi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdagidekchi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdagidekdir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdagidekda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdagidekku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdagidekmikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdagidekmidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimdagidekdirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimgami [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimgachi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimgadir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimgada [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimgaku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimgamikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimgamidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimgadirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimgachami [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimgachachi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimgachadir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimgachada [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimgachaku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimgachamikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimgachamidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimgachadirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimiznimi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimiznichi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimiznidir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimiznida [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizniku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimiznimikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimiznimidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimiznidirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizningmi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizningchi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizningdir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizningda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizningku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizningmikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizningmidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizningdirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdami [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdachi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdadir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdada [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdaku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdamikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdamidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdadirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdanmi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdanchi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdandir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdanda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdanku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdanmikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdanmidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdandirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdagimi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdagichi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdagidir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdagida [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdagiku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdagimikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdagimidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdagidirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdagidekmi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdagidekchi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdagidekdir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdagidekda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdagidekku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdagidekmikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdagidekmidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizdagidekdirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizgami [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizgachi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizgadir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizgada [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizgaku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizgamikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizgamidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizgadirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizgachami [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizgachachi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizgachadir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizgachada [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizgachaku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizgachamikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizgachamidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchimizgachadirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingnimi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingnichi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingnidir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingnida [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingniku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingnimikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingnimidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingnidirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingningmi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingningchi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingningdir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingningda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingningku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingningmikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingningmidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingningdirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdami [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdachi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdadir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdada [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdaku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdamikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdamidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdadirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdanmi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdanchi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdandir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdanda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdanku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdanmikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdanmidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdandirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdagimi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdagichi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdagidir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdagida [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdagiku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdagimikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdagimidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdagidirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdagidekmi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdagidekchi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdagidekdir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdagidekda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdagidekku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdagidekmikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdagidekmidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingdagidekdirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchinggami [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchinggachi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchinggadir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchinggada [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchinggaku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchinggamikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchinggamidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchinggadirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchinggachami [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchinggachachi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchinggachadir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchinggachada [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchinggachaku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchinggachamikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchinggachamidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchinggachadirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingiznimi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingiznichi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingiznidir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingiznida [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizniku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingiznimikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingiznimidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingiznidirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizningmi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizningchi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizningdir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizningda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizningku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizningmikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizningmidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizningdirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdami [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdachi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdadir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdada [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdaku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdamikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdamidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdadirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdanmi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdanchi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdandir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdanda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdanku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdanmikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdanmidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdandirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdagimi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdagichi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdagidir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdagida [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdagiku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdagimikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdagimidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdagidirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdagidekmi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdagidekchi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdagidekdir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdagidekda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdagidekku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdagidekmikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdagidekmidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizdagidekdirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizgami [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizgachi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizgadir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizgada [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizgaku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizgamikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizgamidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizgadirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizgachami [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizgachachi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizgachadir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizgachada [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizgachaku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizgachamikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizgachamidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchingizgachadirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisinimi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisinichi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisinidir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisinida [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisiniku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisinimikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisinimidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisinidirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisiningmi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisiningchi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisiningdir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisiningda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisiningku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisiningmikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisiningmidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisiningdirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidami [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidachi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidadir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidada [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidaku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidamikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidamidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidadirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidanmi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidanchi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidandir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidanda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidanku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidanmikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidanmidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidandirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidagimi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidagichi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidagidir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidagida [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidagiku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidagimikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidagimidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidagidirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidagidekmi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidagidekchi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidagidekdir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidagidekda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidagidekku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidagidekmikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidagidekmidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisidagidekdirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisigami [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisigachi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisigadir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisigada [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisigaku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisigamikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisigamidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisigadirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisigachami [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisigachachi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisigachadir [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisigachada [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisigachaku [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisigachamikan [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisigachamidi [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 nchisigachadirda [aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimnimi [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimnichi [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimnidir [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimnida [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimniku [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimnimikan [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimnimidi [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimnidirda [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimningmi [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimningchi [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimningdir [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimningda [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimningku [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimningmikan [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimningmidi [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimningdirda [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdami [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdachi [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdadir [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdada [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdaku [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdamikan [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdamidi [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdadirda [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdanmi [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdanchi [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdandir [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdanda [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdanku [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdanmikan [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdanmidi [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdandirda [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdagimi [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdagichi [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdagidir [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdagida [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdagiku [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdagimikan [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdagimidi [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdagidirda [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdagidekmi [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdagidekchi [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdagidekdir [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdagidekda [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdagidekku [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdagidekmikan [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdagidekmidi [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimdagidekdirda [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimgami [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimgachi [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimgadir [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimgada [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimgaku [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimgamikan [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimgamidi [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimgadirda [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimgachami [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimgachachi [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimgachadir [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimgachada [^aeiou]
SFX BU 0 inchimgachaku [^aeiou]
